Georgia, session 2025_26, HB803.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes for educational purposes" means all ad valorem taxes for
educational purposes levied by, for, or on behalf of the City of Dublin independent school
district, except for any ad valorem taxes to pay interest on and to retire independent
school district bonded indebtedness.
(2) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended, with the additional qualification that it shall include not more
than five contiguous acres of homestead property.
(b)(1) Each resident of the City of Dublin independent school district who is between 62
and 64 years of age is granted an exemption on such person's homestead from City of
Dublin independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the
amount of $7,000.00 of the assessed value of such homestead. The value of that property
in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation.
(2) Each resident of the City of Dublin independent school district who is between 65
and 72 years of age is granted an exemption on such person's homestead from City of
Dublin independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the
amount of $14,000.00 of the assessed value of such homestead. The value of that
property in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation.
(3) Each resident of the City of Dublin independent school district who is between 73
and 79 years of age is granted an exemption on such person's homestead from City of
Dublin independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the
amount of $21,000.00 of the assessed value of such homestead. The value of that
property in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation.
H. B. 803
- 2 -

LC 47 3622/AP
(4) Each resident of the City of Dublin independent school district who is 80 years of age
or older is granted an exemption on such person's homestead from City of Dublin
independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the full amount
of the assessed value of such homestead. The value of that property in excess of such
exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation.
(c) A person shall not receive the homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless such person or person's agent files an application with the governing authority
of the City of Dublin, or the designee thereof, giving such person's age and such additional
information relative to receiving such exemption as will enable the governing authority of
the City of Dublin, or the designee thereof, to make a determination regarding the initial and
continuing eligibility of such person for such exemption. The governing authority of the City
of Dublin, or the designee thereof, shall provide application forms for this purpose.
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b)
of this section to notify the governing authority of the City of Dublin, or the designee thereof,
in the event that such person for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
(e) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect any
state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, municipal ad valorem
taxes for municipal purposes, or county school district ad valorem taxes for educational
purposes. The homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in lieu
of and not in addition to any other homestead exemption applicable to City of Dublin
independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes.
H. B. 803
- 3 -

LC 47 3622/AP
(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and ending on or before December 31, 2030.
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The municipal election superintendent of the City of Dublin shall call and conduct an
election as provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of
the City of Dublin independent school district for approval or rejection. The municipal
election superintendent shall conduct that election on the Tuesday following the first Monday
in November, 2025, and shall issue the call and conduct that election as provided by general
law. The municipal election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election
to be published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the
official organ of Laurens County. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from City
of Dublin independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational
( ) NO purposes for tax years 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, and 2030:
(1) In the amount of $7,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for
residents of that school district who are between 62 and 64 years of age;
(2) In the amount of $14,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead
for residents of that school district who are between 65 and 72 years of
age;
(3) In the amount of $21,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead
for residents of that school district who are between 73 and 79 years of
H. B. 803
- 4 -

LC 47 3622/AP
age; and
(4) In the full amount of the assessed value of the homestead for residents
of that school district who are 80 years of age or older?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
100 to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
101 such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
102 effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
103 as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
104 be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
105 in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by the City of Dublin. It shall
106 be the municipal election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary
107 of State. The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the municipal election
108 superintendent and are not intended as directory. If the municipal election superintendent
109 fails or refuses to comply with this section, any elector of the City of Dublin independent
110 school district may apply for a writ of mandamus to compel the municipal election
111 superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the court finds that the
112 municipal election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall fashion
113 appropriate relief requiring the municipal election superintendent to call and conduct such
114 election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special
115 elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
116 SECTION 4.
117 Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
118 its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
119 SECTION 5.
120 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 803
- 5 -